Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-1705
Credit union, defined.

Credit union shall mean a cooperative, not-for-profit corporation organized under the Credit Union Act for purposes of educating and encouraging its members in the concept of thrift, creating a source of credit for provident and productive purposes, and carrying on such collateral activities as are set forth in the act.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 64.